Alaska, session 34, SB212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 22.10.120 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 22.10.120. Number of judges. The superior court consists of 46 [45] 06 judges, six of whom shall be judges in the first judicial district, three of whom shall be 07 judges in the second judicial district, 29 [28] of whom shall be judges in the third 08 judicial district, and eight of whom shall be judges in the fourth judicial district. At the 09 time of submitting the names of nominees to the governor to fill a vacancy on the 10 superior court bench, the judicial council shall also designate the district in which the 11 appointee is to reside and serve. 12 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.